Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-311
Registration expiration, resignation, cancellation, or revocation; death of notary public; duties.

(1) When the registration of an electronic notary public expires or is resigned, canceled, or revoked or when an electronic notary public dies, he or she or his or her duly authorized representative shall erase, delete, or destroy the coding, disk, certificate, card, software, file, or program that enables the attachment or logical association of the notary public’s electronic signature.

(2) A former electronic notary public whose previous registration was not revoked, canceled, or denied by the Secretary of State need not erase, delete, or destroy the coding, disk, certificate, card, software, file, or program that enables the attachment or logical association of the notary public’s electronic signature if he or she is reregistered as an electronic notary public using the same electronic signature within three months after the registration expires.

Laws 2016, LB465, § 11.